Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.110

Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, Tulalip, and Colville Indian reservations—Retrocession of criminal jurisdiction—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply throughout RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140:

(1) "Colville reservation" or "Colville Indian reservation," "Quileute reservation" or "Quileute Indian reservation," "Chehalis reservation" or "Chehalis Indian reservation," "Swinomish reservation" or "Swinomish Indian reservation," "Skokomish reservation" or "Skokomish Indian reservation," "Muckleshoot reservation" or "Muckleshoot Indian reservation," or "Tulalip reservation" or "Tulalip Indian reservation" means all tribal lands or allotted lands lying within the reservation of the named tribe and held in trust by the United States or subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States, but does not include those lands which lie north of the present Colville Indian reservation which were included in original reservation boundaries created in 1872 and which are referred to as the "diminished reservation."

(2) "Indian tribe," "tribe," "Colville tribes," or "Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, or Tulalip tribe" means the confederated tribes of the Colville reservation or the tribe of the Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, or Tulalip reservation.

(3) "Tribal court" means the trial and appellate courts of the Colville tribes or the Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, Skokomish, Muckleshoot, or Tulalip tribe.

[ 1995 c 202 s 2; 1995 c 177 s 2; 1994 c 12 s 2; 1988 c 108 s 2; 1986 c 267 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1995 c 177 s 2 and by 1995 c 202 s 2, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Severability—1986 c 267: See note following RCW 37.12.100.